California statutes. Water Code
(b) Notice of a contract for any improvement or work shall be made by the district after publication pursuant to Section 6064 of the Government Code. The notice shall set forth all of the following information:

(1) Plans and specifications of the work to be done can be seen at the office of the district.

(2) The board will receive sealed bids.

(3) The contract will be let to the lowest responsible bidder.

(4) The bids will be opened in public at a given time and place.

(c) If less than the whole work provided for in the plans and specifications is to be done, the portion to be done shall be particularly described in the notice.

(d) All bids for construction work shall be presented under sealed cover and shall be accompanied by one of the following forms of bidder’s security:

(1) Cash.

(2) A cashier’s check made payable to the district.

(3) A certified check made payable to the district.

(4) A bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the district.

(e) Upon an award to the lowest bidder, the security of an unsuccessful bidder shall be returned in a reasonable period, but in no event shall that security be held by the district beyond 60 days from the time the award is made.

(f) The board may do any of the following:

(1) Let the work to the lowest responsible bidder.

(2) Reject any or all bids and readvertise for
 proposals.

(3) Proceed to construct the work under its own superintendence.

(4) If no bids are received, negotiate a contract for the work.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 592, Sec. 1.   (AB 1736)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

60614.

In case of an emergency relating to the repair or replacement of district facilities, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the district shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050) of the Public Contract Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 829, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

60618.

Upon receipt of an offer for a less price than that specified in the lowest rejected bid, the board may enter into a contract for the furnishing of the materials with the person who has offered them at the lowest price.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 888, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

60620.

Any person to whom a contract is awarded shall enter into a bond, to be approved by the district, payable to the district for its use, for 25 percent of the amount of the contract price, conditioned for the full and faithful performance of the contract. The work shall be done under the direction and to the satisfaction of, and be approved by, the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 888, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

60622.

(a) Contracts and other documents executed by the district that require or authorize the district to expend forty thousand dollars ($40,000) or more shall be authorized by the board of directors and signed by the president and the secretary except that the board may, by resolution, authorize a specific contract or other document, not to exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), to be signed by the district manager and one other district representative.

(b) Contracts and other documents executed by the district that require or authorize the district to expend less than forty thousand dollars ($40,000) may be approved and signed by the district manager and one other district representative authorized by the board of directors, provided, however, that the manager shall not execute multiple contracts or documents on behalf of the district with the same person or entity within a one-year period that cumulatively total forty thousand dollars ($40,000) or more, without the board’s prior approval.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 891, Sec. 11.   (SB 1476)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 19. LEVEE DISTRICTS [70000. - 70272.]



PART 1. LEVEE DISTRICT LAW OF 1959 [70000. - 70272.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [70000. - 70001.]

70000.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the Levee District Law of 1959.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

70001.

Nothing in this part affects the provisions of any statute in relation to levee districts now in force.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Formation [70030. - 70047.]

70030.

The people of a county or a portion of a county, whether the portion includes unincorporated territory or not, may form a levee district for the protection of the lands of the district from overflow and for the purpose of conserving or adding water to the sloughs and drains in the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

70031.

The formation petition shall describe the boundaries of the proposed district and shall pray that it be incorporated into a district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

70032.

The formation petition shall be signed by at least 50 percent of the landowners and shall also be signed by the owners of 50 percent of the land to be included in the levee district. The petition may consist of any number of separate instruments. The petition shall be filed with the board of supervisors of the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

70033.

The county elections official of the county containing the proposed district shall publish notice of a hearing on the formation petition pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 190.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

70034.

The notice of the hearing on the formation petition shall contain all of the following:

(a) The text of the petition, which need be set forth only once even though contained upon more than one instrument.

(b) The number of persons who have signed the petition.

(c) At least five of the names attached to the petition.

(d) The time of the meeting of the board of supervisors at which the petition will be presented and considered.

(e) A statement that all persons interested may then appear and be heard.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

70035.

No defects in the contents of the petition, or in the form of the required notice, shall vitiate the formation proceedings, if the petition has a sufficient number of qualified signatures attached.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

70036.

The formation petition shall be presented and considered at a regular meeting of the board of supervisors of the county in which the proposed district is to be situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

70037.

At the time stated in the notice of the hearing the board of supervisors shall hear the petition, and shall hear from any of those who signed the petition and who wish to appear, and shall consider any written protest filed with the clerk of the board prior to the hearing, by or on behalf of owners of taxable property situated within the proposed district. The board of supervisors may adjourn the hearing from time to time, not exceeding four weeks in all.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

70038.

At the hearing of the formation petition the board of supervisors shall determine whether or not the petition complies with this part and for that purpose shall hear all competent and relevant testimony offered in support of or in opposition thereto. The determination shall be entered upon the minutes of the board of supervisors. A finding of the board of supervisors in favor of the genuineness and sufficiency of the petition and notice shall be conclusive against all persons, except the State in a suit by the Attorney General, commenced within one year after the order of the board of supervisors declaring the district formed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

70039.

At the final hearing the board of supervisors may make changes in the boundaries of the proposed district, as may be deemed advisable, and shall then describe the boundaries of the proposed district. In doing this:

(a) No land included in the proposed district in the petition, which will be benefited by the district shall be excluded.

(b) No land which will not, in the judgment of the board, be benefited by the district shall be included.

(c) Upon the application of any person whose land was not included in the petition but whose land will be benefited by the proposed district, the land may, in the discretion of the board, be included.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

70040.

Upon the final determination of the boundaries of the proposed district, the board of supervisors shall call and give notice of a formation election to be held in the proposed district for the purpose of determining whether or not the district shall be formed. The date of the election shall be not less than 50 days nor more than 60 days from the date of the final hearing on the formation petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

70041.

The notice of the formation election shall contain:

(a) The date of the election.

(b) A description of the boundaries of the proposed district.

(c) The name of the proposed district, which name shall contain the words “Levee District.”

(d) A statement that the first directors will be elected at that election.

The county elections official shall publish the notice once a week for at least two weeks prior to the formation election in one newspaper printed and published in the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 191.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

70041.1.

Within five days after the district formation election has been called, the legislative body which has called the election shall transmit, by registered mail, a written notification of the election call to the executive officer of the local agency formation commission of the county or principal county in which the territory or major portion of the territory of the proposed district is located. Such written notice shall include the name and a description of the proposed district, and may be in the form of a certified copy of the resolution adopted by the legislative body calling the district formation election.

The executive officer, within five days after being notified that a district formation election has been called, shall submit to the commission, for its approval or modification, an impartial analysis of the proposed district formation. 

The impartial analysis shall not exceed 500 words in length and shall include a specific description of the boundaries of the district proposed to be formed. 

The local agency formation commission, within five days after the receipt of the executive officer’s analysis, shall approve or modify the analysis and submit it to the officials in charge of conducting the district formation election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 736.)
-------------------------------------------

70041.2.

The board of supervisors or any member or members of the board authorized by the board, or any individual voter or bona fide association of citizens entitled to vote on the district formation proposition, or any combination of such voters and associations of citizens, may file a written argument for or a written argument against the proposed district formation.

Arguments shall not exceed 300 words in length and shall be filed with the officials in charge of conducting the election not less than 54 days prior to the date of the district formation election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 736.)
-------------------------------------------

70041.3.

If more than one argument for or more than one argument against the proposed district formation is filed with the election officials within the time prescribed, such election officials shall select one of the arguments for printing and distribution to the voters.

In selecting the arguments, the election officials shall give preference and priority in the the order named to the arguments of the following:

(a) The board of supervisors or any member or members of the board authorized by the board.

(b) Individual voters or bona fide associations of citizens or a combination of such voters and associations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 736.)
-------------------------------------------

70041.4.

The officials in charge of conducting the election shall cause a ballot pamphlet concerning the district formation proposition to be voted on to be printed and mailed to each voter entitled to vote on the district formation question.

The ballot pamphlet shall contain the following in the order prescribed:

(a) The complete text of the proposition.

(b) The impartial analysis of the proposition prepared by the local agency formation commission.

(c) The argument for the proposed district formation.

(d) The argument against the proposed district formation.

The elections officials shall mail a ballot pamphlet to each voter entitled to vote in the district formation election at least 10 days prior to the date of the election. The ballot pamphlet is “official matter” within the meaning of Section 13303 of the Elections Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 258.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

70042.

At the formation election:

(a) The measure “Shall the proposition to form ____ Levee District under the Levee District Law of 1959 be adopted?” shall be submitted.

(b) The first directors for the proposed district shall be elected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

70043.

The election shall be conducted, the vote canvassed, and the result declared in the same manner provided by the Elections Code, so far as applicable, except as otherwise provided in this part. Each person who wishes to have his name printed on the formation election ballot shall comply with Section 70124. The vote shall be canvassed by the board of supervisors at its next regular meeting, five or more days after the election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

70044.

If less than a majority of the votes cast are in favor of formation, the formation shall fail, but without prejudice to renewing proceedings at any time in the future.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

70045.

If a majority of the votes cast at the formation election are in favor of forming the district, the board of supervisors shall, by an order entered on its minutes, declare the territory formed as a district under the name designated for it, and the county clerk shall immediately cause to be recorded in the office of the county recorder of the county in which the district is situated, a certificate stating that the formation of the district was approved by the voters.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

70046.

No informality in any proceeding, including informality in the conduct of the formation election, not substantially adversely affecting the legal rights of any citizen shall invalidate the organization of a levee district organized under this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

70047.

Except as provided in Section 70038, any proceeding, contesting the validity of the organization of a levee district pursuant to this part, shall be commenced within three months from the date of the recordation of the certificate; subsequently, the organization and legal existence of the district and all proceedings in respect thereto, shall be uncontestable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Internal Organization [70070. - 70093.]



  ARTICLE 1. The Board of Directors [70070. - 70078.]

70070.

A district shall have a board of three directors, each of whom shall be an elector of the district. The term of office of the directors shall be four years except that the directors first elected, upon the formation of the district, who shall serve only until their successors are elected and qualified.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

70071.

The three directors elected at the election held pursuant to the provisions of the Uniform District Election Law (Part 4 (commencing with Section 10500) of Division 10 of the Elections Code), or appointed pursuant to Section 10515 of the Elections Code, shall take office at 12 o'clock noon on the first Monday after the January 1st succeeding their election. Directors shall hold office until their successors are elected and qualified.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 259.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

70072.

Any vacancies in the offices of the directors shall be filled pursuant to Section 1780 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1059.)
-------------------------------------------

70073.

Each director shall, before entering upon the duties of his office, take an oath of office and file the same with the county clerk. The directors shall, at their first meeting after taking office, elect a chairman and a clerk from their own membership.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

70074.

The majority of the members of the board of directors shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

70075.

The directors shall keep a minute book in which shall be entered the proceedings of all meetings and shall keep an office for the transaction of the district’s business.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

70076.

The directors shall hold regular meetings on the second Monday of each and every month. Special meetings may be held when all members are present or may be ordered by a majority of the directors by an order in writing, signed by the directors calling such meeting. A one day’s notice of a special meeting must be given to the member of the board not joining in the order. All meetings must be held at the office of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

70078.

Each member of the board shall receive compensation for services actually and necessarily performed, as the board determines to be just and reasonable, and shall be reimbursed for expenses necessarily incurred in the performance of his or her duties as director. The salaries of all officers and employees of the district shall be fixed and determined by the directors. The board of directors shall fix the compensation that the election officers shall receive for district elections. For purposes of this section, the determination of whether a director’s activities on any specific day are compensable shall be made pursuant to Article 2.3 (commencing with Section 53232) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code. Reimbursement for these expenses is subject to Sections 53232.2 and 53232.3 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 700, Sec. 38.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Other Officers and Employees [70090. - 70093.]

70090.

The treasurer of the county in which a district is located shall be the treasurer of the district. The tax collector of the county in which a district is located shall be the tax collector of the district. The auditor of the county in which a district is located shall be the auditor of the district. The assessor of the county in which a district is located shall be the assessor of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

70091.

The treasurer, tax collector, auditor, and assessor shall each enter into a bond to the district in an amount to be determined by the board of directors for the faithful performance of their official duties and they shall be filed with the board of directors. The premiums for the surety bonds required from the treasurer, tax collector, auditor and assessor shall be paid by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

70092.

The directors may appoint a district engineer. The construction or repair of any levees or associated works shall be under the direction, and to the satisfaction, of the engineer of the district and shall be subject to the approval of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

70093.

The directors shall have the power to employ an attorney or attorneys for the purpose of advising them or advising other officers of the district and to prosecute or defend actions brought by or against the district, or any of its officers relative to district matters.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Elections [70120. - 70121.]

70120.

Except as otherwise provided in this part, districts governed under this part are subject to the provisions of the Uniform District Election Law (Part 4 (commencing with Section 10500) of Division 10 of the Elections Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 260.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

70121.

In order to vote at any district election, including the formation election, a person must be a qualified elector of the district. A “qualified elector of the district” is one who meets all of the following qualifications:

(a) He shall be a registered voter.

(b) He shall reside in the district.

(c) His name shall appear on the last equalized assessment roll of the county. 

(d) He shall own property assessed within the boundaries of the district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 506, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Powers and Purposes [70150. - 70151.]



  ARTICLE 1. Powers Generally [70150. - 70151.]

70150.

The district may acquire by purchase, condemnation, gift or other action, drains, canals, sluices, bulkheads, watergates, levees, embankments, pumping plants and pipelines and to purchase, construct or otherwise acquire, maintain and keep in repair all things reasonable or convenient for the protection of the lands of the district from overflow and for the purpose of conserving or adding water to the sloughs and drains in the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

70151.

The district may co-operate and contract with the United States, the State of California, or any department or agency of either, in order to accomplish any of the purposes of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Financial Provisions [70200. - 70204.]

70200.

All claims for money or damages against the district are governed by Part 3 (commencing with Section 900) and Part 4 (commencing with Section 940) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code except as provided therein, or by other statutes or regulations expressly applicable thereto. Claims not governed thereby or by other statutes or by ordinances or regulations authorized by law and expressly applicable to such claims shall be prepared and presented to the governing body, and all claims shall be audited and paid, in the same manner and with the same effect as similar claims against the county. Upon request from the directors, the auditor shall draw his warrant on the treasurer for the payment of claims.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1715.)
-------------------------------------------

70201.

The auditor shall keep all necessary and proper books of account which shall contain all receipts and expenditures with their source and nature. The books and accounts of the district shall be audited once each year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

70202.

All moneys received or collected for or on behalf of the district shall be paid to the treasurer in the same manner as county money is paid to the treasurer. Upon receipt of any money from the tax collector or from any other source the treasurer shall place the same to the credit of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

70203.

The treasurer shall pay out funds only on warrants drawn by the auditor upon district funds in the same manner as county money is paid out. Warrants presented and not paid for lack of funds shall be registered and bear interest at the rate of 6 percent per annum from date of registration to date of payment or call.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

70204.

Claims for salaries and services shall be sworn and approved by the board of directors before a warrant is drawn for the same.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Taxes [70230. - 70244.]

70230.

The board of directors shall avail itself of the equalized assessment roll of the county in which the district is situated, and take such assessments as the basis for district taxation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

70231.

On or before the third Monday in August each year, the county auditor shall transmit to the board of directors a written statement showing the total value of all taxable land and improvements within the district, which value shall be ascertained from the equalized assessment roll of the county.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

70234.

The board of directors shall meet on the first Tuesday after the first Monday of September of each year to determine the rate of tax to be levied for district purposes for the next ensuing year. The amount of money to be raised shall be estimated by including the following:

(a) The amount necessary to pay the interest and the part of the principal of the funded debt that will become due in the current year.

(b) The amount needed for salaries, wages, repairs, maintenance and operation. 

(c) The amount needed for salvage, fees and delinquencies.

(d) The amount of floating debt that it may be desirable to pay during the current year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

70235.

The board shall, after fixing the tax rate, certify the same to the county auditor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

70237.

The county auditor shall compute the district tax on the property within the district using the rate of levy so fixed by the board and the assessed value as found in such assessment roll.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

70238.

The district taxes shall be collected at the same time and in the same manner as county taxes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

70239.

All taxes levied under the provisions of this part shall be a lien on the property on which they are levied. All of the provisions of law, relative to the collection of state and county taxes, including the time for their payment, the giving of notice as to such time of payment, when they become delinquent, the penalties, costs and interest that shall accrue for their nonpayment and the period and manner of redemption are made applicable to the collection, payment, delinquency and redemption of district taxes except when inconsistent with this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

70240.

The tax collector shall sell to the district, for the nonpayment of taxes, the property assessed at the same time and in the same manner as property assessed for state and county taxes is sold. If the delinquent property is not redeemed within the period provided for the redemption of property sold to the State, then the tax collector shall deed the property to the district in the same manner as property is deeded to the State for nonpayment of taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

70241.

All acts of the officials of the district in the levy and collection of district taxes shall be given the same credence and shall have the same presumptions as to the regularity of such actions as are given by law to the acts of officials charged with the levy and collection of state and county taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

70242.

All deeds executed by the officers of the district shall be conclusive as to all recitals contained therein and that all acts required by law have been regularly done, and all steps required by law have been regularly taken.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

70243.

The tax collector shall, when requested, furnish the board a complete list of all delinquent taxes, of the persons owing the same and a certified copy of the assessment contained in the assessment roll.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

70244.

In the case of a sale of property for taxes or assessments, except where the sale is conducted and the funds are accounted for as provided in Division 1 (commencing with Section 101) of the Revenue and Taxation Code, all proceeds shall be accounted for and distributed as provided in Article 12 (commencing with Section 53925) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 648.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Reorganization [70270. - 70272.]

70270.

Whenever any district formed under the Protection District Act of 1880 or any other act for the protection of lands from overflow desires to reorganize under this part the district may bring itself within the provisions of this part by unanimously adopting a resolution stating that they have elected to reorganize under this part. Upon the filing of a certified copy of such resolution with the county clerk and the recording of a certified copy of such resolution with the county recorder of the county wherein said district is located the district shall thereafter be organized and shall operate under and pursuant to the provisions of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 665.)
-------------------------------------------

70271.

The original district directors shall be deemed the successors and legal representatives of the district so reorganized.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

70272.

This reorganization shall in no manner impair any obligation heretofore legally incurred by the reorganized levee district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 20. MUNICIPAL WATER DISTRICTS [71000. - 73001.]



PART 1. INTRODUCTORY PROVISIONS [71000. - 71036.]



  CHAPTER 1. Short Title [71000. - 71000.]

71000.

This division shall be known and may be cited as the Municipal Water District Law of 1911.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Definitions [71010. - 71019.]

71010.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the provisions of this chapter govern the construction of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71011.

The definition of a word applies to any of its variants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71012.

“City” means any chartered or general law city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71013.

“District” means a municipal water district formed pursuant to the Municipal Water District Act of 1911 or this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71014.

“Board” means the board of directors of a district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71015.

“Principal county” means the county in which the greater portion of the land of a district or a proposed district is situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71016.

“Affected county” means any county in which the land of a district, or proposed district, is situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71017.

“Voter” means a voter as defined in Section 359 of the Elections Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 261.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

71018.

“President” means the president of the board of directors of a district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71019.

“Secretary” means the secretary of a district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. General Provisions [71030. - 71036.]

71030.

Nothing in this division shall be construed as repealing or modifying any other law relating to water or the supply of water to cities, or the acquisition thereof by cities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71032.

The inclusion in, or annexation or addition to, a district, of the territory of any public corporation or agency shall not destroy the identity or legal existence, or impair the powers, of the public corporation or agency, notwithstanding the identity, or substantial identity, of purpose of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71034.

Except as otherwise provided in Sections 72322 and 72341, whenever provision is made in this division for notice in a county, it shall be construed to require notice in each affected county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71035.

Except with respect to formation proceedings, in any district containing lands situated in more than one county, all papers required by this division to be filed with a county clerk shall be filed with the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71036.

Except as otherwise provided in this division, procedure relating to formation, fiscal matters, and taxation in districts containing lands situated in more than one county shall conform as near as may be to such provisions with respect to districts containing lands situated in one county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2043.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. FORMATION [71050. - 71196.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [71050. - 71052.]

71050.

Unless the context otherwise requires, as used in this part, “county clerk” means the county clerk of the principal county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71051.

Unless the context otherwise requires, as used in this part, “board of supervisors” means the board of supervisors of the principal county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71052.

As used in this part, “application” means an application for the initiation of proceedings for the formation of a district under the provisions of the Knox-Nisbet Act, Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 54773), Part 1, Division 2, Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 310.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Territory [71060. - 71081.]



  ARTICLE 1. In General [71060. - 71061.]

71060.

The people of any county or counties, or of any portions thereof, whether such portions include unincorporated territory only or incorporated territory of any city or cities, or both such incorporated and unincorporated territory, may organize a district under the provisions of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71061.

The cities proposed to be included in the district need not be contiguous, and the unincorporated territory may consist of one or more parcels which need not be contiguous to each other or to any such city or cities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Inclusion of Cities [71070. - 71081.]

71070.

As used in this article, “territory of a city” means the corporate area of the city and all territory as to which proceedings for annexation to the city have been commenced by a valid petition filed with the governing body of the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71071.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, if an application includes any portion of a city, the entire territory of the city, at the time of filing the application, shall be included within the boundaries of the proposed district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 310.)
-------------------------------------------

71072.

If an application includes any territory within the boundaries of a proposed city for which a valid petition for incorporation has been filed with the board of supervisors of the affected county, the entire area of the proposed city, at the time of filing the application, shall be included within the boundaries of the proposed district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 310.)
-------------------------------------------

71073.

If an application is filed, and proceedings for the formation of the district are commenced and prosecuted, in the manner and within the time specified by this part, the inclusion within the boundaries of the proposed district of any city to which territory is annexed, pursuant to proceedings which were not commenced by the filing of a valid petition prior to the approval of the application, shall not prevent or invalidate the formation of the district even though the territory annexed to the city pursuant to the annexation proceedings is not included in the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 310.)
-------------------------------------------

71074.
